Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Chapter 7. Surface Mining and Reclamation of Land

§ 53-7-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Surface Mining and Reclamation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-3.
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature of the State of Mississippi finds and declares that:

Mississippi is endowed with abundant varied natural resources which serve as a source of recreation and economic benefit to our people;

The extraction of materials by surface mining is a significant economic activity and is an integral part of the growth and development of this state;

The process of surface mining necessarily involves the alteration of the face of the land;

The process of surface mining must be accomplished in a manner to reduce the undesirable effects of surface mining to a bare minimum, and to protect and preserve our land which is one of our greatest natural resources; and

The land whose face has been altered by surface mining requires reclamation to prevent permanent damage to surface water and the land so that it may be used by future generations, to protect the safety and welfare of Mississippians, and to preserve available natural resources.

The Legislature, recognizing its duty and obligation to foster the economic well-being of the state and nation, to encourage the development of its natural resources and to preserve the beauty of its lands, declares that the purpose of this chapter is to:

Provide for the regulation and control of surface mining so as to minimize its injurious effects by requiring proper reclamation of surface-mined lands;

Establish a regulatory system of permits and reclamation standards, supplemented by the knowledge, expertise and concerns of mining operators, landowners and the general public which is designed to achieve an acceptable, workable balance between the economic necessities of developing our natural resources and the public interest in protecting our birthright of natural beauty and a pristine environment; and

Establish a regulatory system of uniform standards and procedures to govern the mining and reclamation of land, accepting the proposition that varied types of mining, varied types of materials being mined and varied geographical and ecological areas of this state may require variations in methods of surface mining and reclamation, but any variation shall be designed to restore the affected area to a useful, productive and beneficial purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-5.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section, except where the context otherwise requires:

“Affected area” means any area from which any materials are removed or are to be removed in a surface mining operation and upon which any materials are to be deposited. The affected area includes all areas affected by the construction of new roads, or the improvement or use of existing roads other than public roads to gain access and to haul materials.

“Appeal” means an appeal to an appropriate court of the state taken from a final decision of the Permit Board or commission made after a formal hearing before that body.

“As recorded in the minutes of the Permit Board” means the date of the Permit Board meeting at which the action concerned is taken by the Permit Board.

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, acting through the Office of Geology and Energy Resources or a successor office.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Exploration activity” means the disturbance of the surface or subsurface for the purpose of determining the location, quantity or quality of a deposit of any material, except the drilling of test holes or core holes of twelve (12) inches or less in diameter.

“Formal hearing” means a hearing on the record, as recorded and transcribed by a court reporter, before the commission or Permit Board where all parties to the hearing are allowed to present witnesses, cross-examine witnesses and present evidence for inclusion into the record, as appropriate under rules promulgated by the commission or Permit Board.

“Fund” means the Surface Mining and Reclamation Fund created by Section 53-7-69.

“General permit” means general permit as defined in Section 49-17-5.

“Highwall” means a wall created by mining having a slope steeper than two (2) to one (1).

“Interested party” means interested party as provided under Section 49-17-29.

“Material” means bentonite, metallic ore, mineral clay, dolomite, phosphate, sand, gravel, soil, clay, sand clay, clay gravel, stone, chalk, and any other materials designated by the commission.

“Nearest approximate original contour” means that surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading of the surface-mined area so that it substantially resembles the surface configuration of the land before mining and blends into and complements the drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain, with all highwalls, spoil piles and water-collecting depressions eliminated, to the extent practicable, unless contained in an approved reclamation plan.

“Operator” means the person that is to engage or that is engaged in a surface mining operation, whether on a permanent, continuous basis, or for a limited period of time and for a specific or ancillary purpose, including any person whose permit or coverage under a general permit has expired or been suspended or revoked.

“Overburden” means all materials which are removed to gain access to other materials in the process of surface mining, including the material before or after its removal by surface mining.

“Permit” means a permit to conduct surface mining and reclamation operations under this chapter.

“Permit area” means all the area designated in the permit application or application for coverage under a general permit and shall include all land affected by the surface mining operations during the term of the permit and may include any contiguous area which the operator proposes to surface mine thereafter.

“Permit Board” means the Permit Board created by Section 49-17-28.

“Person” means any individual, trust, firm, joint-stock company, public or private corporation, joint venture, partnership, association, cooperative, state, or any agency or institution thereof, municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state or any interstate body, and includes any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or the United States or any officer or employee of the United States.

“Public hearing” means a public forum organized by the commission, department or Permit Board for the purpose of providing information to the public regarding a surface mining and reclamation operation and at which members of the public are allowed to make comments or ask questions or both of the commission, department or the Permit Board regarding a proposed operation or permit.

“Reclamation” means work necessary to restore an area of land affected by surface mining to a useful, productive and beneficial purpose, the entire process being designed to restore the land to a useful, productive and beneficial purpose, suitable and amenable to surrounding land and consistent with local environmental conditions in accordance with the standards set forth in this chapter.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

“Spoil pile” means the overburden and other mined waste material as it is piled or deposited in the process of surface mining.

“Surface mining” or “mining” means the extraction of materials from the ground or water or from waste or stock piles or from pits or banks or natural occurrences by methods including, but not limited to, strip drift, open pit, contour or auger mining, dredging, placering, quarrying and leaching, and activities related thereto, which will alter the surface.

“Surface mining operation” or “operation” means the activities conducted at a mining site, including extraction, storage, processing and shipping of materials and reclamation of the affected area. This term does not include the following: the dredging and removal of oyster shells from navigable bodies of water; the dredging and removal of any materials from the bed of navigable streams, when the activity is regulated and permitted under an individual permit by the United States Corps of Engineers; the extraction of hydrocarbons in a liquid or gaseous state by means of wells, pipe, or other on-site methods; the off-site transportation of materials; exploration activities; construction activities at a construction site; or any other exception adopted by the commission in its regulations.

“Topsoil” means the organic or inorganic matter naturally present on the surface of the earth which has been subjected to and influenced by genetic and environmental factors of parent material, climate, macroorganisms and microorganisms, and topography, all acting over a period of time, and that is necessary for the growth and regeneration of vegetation on the surface of the earth.

“Toxic material” means any substance present in sufficient concentration or amount to cause significant injury or illness to plant, animal, aquatic or human life.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 3; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 43; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-7.
Permit requirement; applicability of law; exceptions and exemptions.

Except as provided in this section, it is unlawful to commence an operation or operate a surface mine without a permit or coverage under a general permit as provided by this chapter.

Except as expressly provided in this section, this chapter shall not apply to:

Excavations made by the owner of land for the owner’s own use and not for commercial purposes, where the materials removed do not exceed one thousand (1,000) cubic yards per year and where one (1) acre or less of land is affected;

Excavations made by a public agency on a one-time basis for emergency use at an emergency site if:

The excavation lies in the vicinity of the emergency site and affects less than one-fourth (1/4) acre of mined surface area;

The landowner has signed a statement giving approval for the removal of the materials; and

The public agency notifies the department as required by the commission within two (2) working days of the removal of the materials;

Operations for any materials on any affected area conducted before April 15, 1978, but this chapter shall apply to any additional land which the operation extended to or encompassed after April 15, 1978;

Operations for any materials that affected four (4) acres or less and were greater than one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet from any other affected area if:

The operation began before July 1, 2002; and

The operator notified the commission of the commencement, expansion or resumption of the operation before July 1, 2002;

Operations for any materials that affect four (4) acres or less, are greater than one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet from any other affected area and commenced after July 1, 2002, if the operator notifies the department at least seven (7) calendar days before commencement or expansion of the operation as required in regulations adopted by the commission. The seven-day notice prior to mining requirement shall be waived and the operator may begin mining immediately after notifying the department if:

The operator agrees, in the notification, to reclaim the mine site in accordance with the minimum standards adopted by the commission; or

The exempted operation is conducted for Mississippi Department of Transportation projects or state aid road construction projects funded in whole or in part by public funds; and

Excavations made by the owner of land where the materials removed are transported to another location on that same land without using any public highway, road or street, and where the distance between the excavation and the location where the materials are deposited does not exceed five (5) miles; provided, that the owner of such land has the legal right to the materials.

Exempt operations under paragraph (e) that are conducted for the MDOT projects or state aid road construction projects shall be reclaimed in accordance with the requirements of the Mississippi Standard Specifications for Road and Bridge Construction, Mississippi Department of Transportation or Division of State Aid Road Construction, as applicable. Any operator failing to reclaim as required under this subsection may be subject to the penalties provided in Section 53-7-59(2).

If a landowner refuses to allow the operator to complete reclamation in accordance with minimum standards or interferes with or authorizes a third party to disturb or interfere with reclamation in accordance with minimum standards, the landowner shall assume the exempt notice and shall be responsible for any reclamation.

All operations exempted under Sections 53-7-7(2)(d) and 53-7-7(2)(e) shall be subject to the prohibitions on mining in certain areas contained in Sections 53-7-49 and 53-7-51 and may be subject to the penalties in Section 53-7-59(2) for any violation of those sections.

Any operator conducting operations exempted under Section 53-7-7(2) (b) or 53-7-7(2)(e) failing to notify the department in accordance with the regulations of the commission, may be subject to penalties provided in Section 53-7-59(2). Any operator exempted under Section 53-7-7(2)(e) who agrees in the notification to reclaim and fails to reclaim in accordance with that paragraph may be subject to penalties provided in Section 53-7-59(2).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 4(1, 2); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 394, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 53-7-9.
Administration and enforcement of chapter.

The department is designated as the agency to administer this chapter.The commission is designated as the body to enforce this chapter, including, but not limited to, the issuance of administrative and penalty orders, promulgation of regulations regarding matters addressed in this chapter, and designation of lands unsuitable for surface mining.The Permit Board is designated as the body to issue, deny, modify, revoke, transfer, cancel, rescind, suspend and reissue permits under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 4(3); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-11.
Rules and regulations; public hearing; notice; comments.

The commission may adopt, modify, repeal, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from and may enforce rules and regulations pertaining to surface mining and reclamation operations to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Adopting rules and regulations, the commission shall comply with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, and in addition, may hold a public hearing. Notice of the date, time, place and purpose of the hearing shall be given thirty (30) days before the scheduled date of the hearing as follows:

By mail to:

All operators known by the commission to be actively engaged in surface mining in the state;

Persons who request notification of proposed actions regarding rules and regulations and any other person the commission deems appropriate; and

The Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission, the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, Mississippi Forestry Commission, Mississippi Department of Archives and History, Mississippi Department of Transportation and the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce.

By publication once weekly for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the State of Mississippi.

Any person may submit written comments or appear and offer oral comments at the public hearing. The commission shall consider all comments and relevant data presented at the hearing before final adoption of rules and regulations under this chapter. The failure of any person to submit comments within a time period as established by the commission shall not preclude action by the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 5(1); Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 320; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 96; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§§ 53-7-13,
53-7-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 492, §§ 35, 36, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§53-7-13. [Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 5(2).]

§53-7-15. [Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 5(3, 4).]

§ 53-7-17.
Commission to retain exclusive jurisdiction on passage of federal strip mining legislation.

Upon the passage of any federal surface mining legislation, the commission shall take steps necessary to establish the exclusive jurisdiction of the commission over the regulation of surface mining and reclamation operations in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977 ch. 476, § 5(5); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-19.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties regarding surface mining:

To develop a statewide, comprehensive policy for the regulation of surface mining and reclamation consistent with this chapter;

To hold public and formal hearings, to issue notices of hearing, to administer oaths or affirmations, to issue subpoenas requiring the appearance of witnesses requested by any party and compel their attendance, and to require production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements or other documents or records that are relevant or material to the administration of this chapter and to take testimony as deemed necessary;

To issue, modify or revoke orders requiring an operator to take any actions necessary to comply with this chapter, rules and regulations adopted under this chapter or any permit or coverage under a general permit required by this chapter;

To enter on and inspect for the purpose of assuring compliance with the terms of this chapter, in person or by an authorized agent of the department, any surface mining operation subject to this chapter;

To conduct, or cause to be conducted, encourage, request and participate in studies, surveys, investigations, research, experiments, training and demonstrations by contract, grant or otherwise; to prepare and require permittees to prepare reports; and to collect information and disseminate to the public information such as is deemed reasonable and necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter;

To apply for, receive and expend any grants, gifts, loans or other funds made available from any source for the purpose of this chapter;

To advise, consult, cooperate with, or enter into contracts or grants with federal, state and local boards and agencies having pertinent expertise for the purpose of obtaining professional and technical services necessary to carry out this chapter;

To enter into contracts with persons to reclaim land under this chapter;

To order the immediate cessation of any ongoing surface mining operation being conducted with or without a permit or coverage under a general permit if it finds that the operation endangers the health or safety of the public or creates imminent and significant environmental harm;

To institute and maintain all court actions necessary to obtain the enforcement of any written order of the commission;

To recognize the differences in the various materials, taking into consideration the commercial value of the material and the nature and size of operation necessary to extract the deposit, in regulating surface mining operations;

To authorize the executive director to discharge or exercise any power or duty granted to the commission by this chapter; and

To perform any other duties and acts required or provided for by this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 44; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-21.
Surface mining permits; issuance; certificate of compliance.

Unless exempted under Section 53-7-7, no operator shall engage in surface mining without having first obtained coverage under a general permit or having obtained from the Permit Board a permit for each operation. The permit or coverage under a general permit shall authorize the operator to engage in surface mining upon the area of land described in the application for a period of either five (5) years or longer period of time as deemed appropriate by the Permit Board from the date of issuance or until reclamation of the affected area is completed and the reclamation bond is finally released, whichever comes first.

Each operator holding a permit shall annually, before the anniversary date of the permit, file with the department a certificate of compliance in which the operator, under oath, shall declare that the operator is following the approved mining and reclamation plan and is abiding by this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 7(1, 2); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-23.
Issuance of general permits; conditions; application for permit; reclamation plan; review of application.

The Permit Board may issue general permits consistent with regulations adopted by the commission to cover those surface mining operations deemed appropriate by the Permit Board. Conditions in any general permit shall provide that no operation shall be conducted on lands designated as unsuitable for mining and that each operator shall submit a proposed initial reclamation plan and a performance bond in an amount sufficient to properly reclaim the permit area. The Permit Board may include other conditions as required by the rules and regulations of the commission.

Before commencing any operation for which coverage under a general permit may be obtained, each applicant for coverage under a general permit shall submit to the department an application in the form and containing the information as the department shall specify, including a copy of the proposed initial reclamation plan and except as otherwise provided by this section, a performance bond in an amount proposed by the applicant to be sufficient to properly reclaim the permit area. As the operation progresses, the applicant may revise the reclamation plan and submit the revised plan to the department for approval. The amount of the proposed performance bond shall not be less than the minimum provided in Section 53-7-37.

The Permit Board shall issue a general permit for surface mining operations having a permitted area of more than four (4) acres but less than ten (10) acres which are conducted for projects funded in whole or in part by public funds for the Mississippi Department of Transportation or the Division of State Aid Road Construction. The general permit issued under this subsection shall require that all materials obtained from an operation covered under this general permit shall be used exclusively on the Mississippi Department of Transportation or Division of State Aid Road Construction project and that no materials from an operation covered under this permit may be provided or sold for any other purpose. The Permit Board shall consult with the Mississippi Department of Transportation on the development of this general permit. An applicant for a coverage under a general permit issued under this subsection shall submit an application for coverage and a proposed initial reclamation plan as required by this section, but the applicant shall not be required to post a performance bond under this section, if the applicant submits a copy of the bond posted with the Mississippi Department of Transportation or the Division of State Aid Road Construction. The Mississippi Department of Transportation or the Division of State Aid Road Construction shall not release the bond until all reclamation requirements of the general permit issued under this section have been met. No operation conducted under a general permit issued under this subsection shall be conducted in lands designated as unsuitable for mining under Section 53-7-49 or 53-7-51. The Permit Board may include other conditions as required by the rules and regulations of the commission in the general permit issued under this section.

Within three (3) working days after receiving the application for coverage under a general permit, the department shall review the application, determine if the proposed surface mining operation is eligible for coverage under a general permit, and notify the applicant in writing accordingly. Operations may commence at the mining site after the operator receives notice of coverage.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 7(3); Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 45; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-25.
General permit application fees.

Each application for a surface mining permit and for coverage under a general permit shall be accompanied by an application fee in accordance with a published fee schedule adopted by the commission. The application fee shall not be less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) plus Ten Dollars ($10.00) per acre included in the application. The total application fee shall not exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). The commission, in considering regulations on the fee schedule, shall recognize the difference in the various materials, taking into consideration the commercial value of the material and the nature and size of operation necessary to extract it.

All state agencies, political subdivisions of the state, and local governing bodies shall be exempt from all fees required by this chapter.

Upon submission of the certificate of compliance required under Section 53-7-21, each operator shall pay a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 7(4); Laws, 1979, ch. 477, § 46; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-27.
Submission of application for permit, proposed initial reclamation plan, and performance bond; form of application.

Before commencing any operation for which a permit is required, each applicant for a permit shall submit to the Permit Board an application, a proposed initial reclamation plan and a performance bond in an amount proposed to be sufficient by the applicant to reclaim the permit area.

The application shall be in the form prescribed by the commission and shall contain the following information:

A legal description of the tract or tracts of land in the affected area and one or more maps or plats of adequate scale to clearly portray the location of the affected area. The description shall contain sufficient information so that the affected area may be located and distinguished from other lands and shall identify the access from the nearest public road;

The approximate location and depth of the deposit in the permit area and the total number of acres in the permit area;

The name, address and management officers of the permit applicant and any affiliated persons who shall be engaged in the operations;

The name and address of any person holding legal and equitable interests of record, if reasonably ascertainable, in the surface estate of the permit area and in the surface estate of land located within five hundred (500) feet of the exterior limits of the permit area;

The name and address of any person residing on the property of the permit area at the time of application;

Current or previous surface mining permits held by the applicant, including any revocations, suspensions or bond forfeitures;

The type and method of operation, the engineering techniques and the equipment that is proposed to be used, including mining schedules, the nature and expected amount of overburden to be removed, the depth of excavations, a description of the permit area, the anticipated hydrologic consequences of the mining operation, and the proposed use of explosives for blasting, including the nature of the explosive, the proposed location of the blasting and the expected effect of the blasting;

A notarized statement showing the applicant’s legal right to surface mine the affected area;

The names and locations of all lakes, rivers, reservoirs, streams, creeks and other bodies of water in the vicinity of the contemplated operations which may be affected by the operations and the types of existing vegetative cover on the area affected thereby and on adjoining lands within five hundred (500) feet of the exterior limits of the affected area;

A topographical survey map showing the surface drainage plan on and away from the permit area;

The surface location and extent of all existing and proposed waste and spoil piles, cuts, pits, tailing dumps, ponds, borrow pits, evaporation and settling basins, roads, buildings, access ways, workings and installations sufficient to provide a reasonably clear and accurate portrayal of the existing surface conditions and the proposed mining operations;

If the surface and mineral estates, or any part of those estates, in land covered by the application, have been severed and are owned by separate owners, the applicant shall provide a notarized statement subscribed to by each surface owner and lessee of those lands, unless the lease or other conveyance to the applicant specifically states the material to be mined by the operator granting consent for the applicant to initiate and conduct surface mining, exploration and reclamation activities on the land;

Except for governmental agencies, a certificate of insurance certifying that the applicant has in force a public liability insurance policy issued by an insurance company authorized to conduct business in the State of Mississippi covering all operations of the applicant in this state and affording bodily injury protection and property damage protection in an amount not less than the following:

One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for all damages because of bodily injury sustained by one (1) person as the result of any one (1) occurrence, and Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) for all damages because of bodily injury sustained by two (2) or more persons as the result of any one (1) occurrence; and

One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for all claims arising out of damage to property as the result of any one (1) occurrence including completed operations;

The policy shall be maintained in full force and effect during the term of the permit, including the length of all reclamation operations.

A copy of a proposed initial reclamation plan prepared under Section 53-7-31; and

Any other information needed to clarify the required parts of the application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 8(1); Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-29.
Filing of copies of permit applications for public inspection with certain state agencies; review of application by agencies; comments and recommendations.

The department shall file a copy of each permit application for public inspection with the chancery clerk of the county where any portion of the operation is proposed to occur after deleting the confidential information according to Section 53-7-75.

The department shall submit copies, excluding all confidential information, of the permit application as soon as possible to: (a) the Mississippi Soil and Water Conservation Commission, Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, Mississippi Forestry Commission, Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, Mississippi Department of Archives and History, Mississippi Department of Transportation, Mississippi State Oil and Gas Board and Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce; (b) any other state agency whose jurisdiction the department believes the particular mining operation may affect; and (c) any person who requests in writing a copy of the application; and (d) the owner of the land. The department shall require payment of a reasonable fee established by the commission for reimbursement of the costs of reproducing and providing the copy.

Each agency shall review the permit application and submit, within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the application, any comments, recommendations and evaluations as the agency deems necessary and proper based only upon the effect of the proposed operation on matters within the agency’s jurisdiction. The comments shall include a listing of permits or licenses required under the agency’s jurisdiction. Comments and recommendations shall be made a part of the record and one (1) copy shall be furnished to the applicant. All comments and recommendations shall be considered by, but shall not be binding upon, the Permit Board. The failure of any agency to submit comments shall not preclude action by the Permit Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 8(2, 3); Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 321; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 97; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-31.
Reclamation plans; contents; reclaiming lands in lieu of lands included in notice of intent.

A reclamation plan shall be developed in a manner consistent with local, physical, environmental and climatological conditions and current mining and reclamation technology. A proposed initial reclamation plan submitted as part of a permit application shall include the following information:

The identification of the proposed affected area, accompanied by a detailed topographic map on a scale required by regulation showing:

The proposed affected area, the location of any stream or standing body of water into which the area drains, the location of drainways and any planned siltation traps and other impoundments, and the location of access roads to be prepared or used by the operator in the mining operation;

The location of any buildings, cemeteries, public highways, railroad tracks, gas and oil wells, publicly owned land, sanitary landfills, officially designated scenic areas, utility lines, underground mines, transmission lines or pipelines within the affected area or within five hundred (500) feet of the exterior limits of the affected area;

The approximate location of the cuts or excavations to be made in the surface and the estimated location and height of spoil banks, and the total number of acres involved in the affected area;

The date the map was prepared and a statement of its accuracy by the person responsible for its preparation.

The condition of the land to be covered by the permit before any mining, including:

The land use existing at the time of the application, and if the land has a history of previous mining, the land use, if reasonably ascertainable, which immediately preceded any mining; and

The capability of the land before any mining to support a variety of uses, giving consideration to soil and foundation characteristics, topography and vegetative cover.

The capacity of the land to support its anticipated use following reclamation, including a discussion of the capacity of the reclaimed land to support alternative uses.

A description of how the proposed postmining land condition is to be achieved and the necessary support activities that may be needed to achieve the condition, including an estimate of the cost per acre of the reclamation.

The steps taken to comply with applicable air and water quality and water rights laws and regulations and any applicable health and safety standards, including copies of any pertinent permit applications.

A general timetable that the applicant estimates will be necessary for accomplishing the major events contained in the reclamation plan.

Any other information as the Permit Board shall determine to be reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

The Permit Board may, in its discretion, authorize the reclamation of lands in lieu of the lands included in the permit application. The acreage of the authorized lieu lands reclaimed shall not be less than the acreage of the lands in the permit application. Any applicant who proposes to reclaim lands in lieu of those lands included in the permit application shall state that fact in the application or subsequent or amended application and shall submit the reclamation plan accordingly. The Permit Board shall not authorize the reclamation of lieu lands unless the applicant submits with the reclamation plan a notarized statement of each surface owner and lessee of all lands included in the permit application. The statement shall contain the consent of each surface owner and lessee for the reclamation of the proposed lieu lands. If the Permit Board does not authorize the reclamation of the lieu lands, the applicant shall submit a reclamation plan for the lands contained in the permit application.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 9; Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 53-7-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 492, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

[Laws, 1977, ch. 476, § 10, eff from and after April 15, 1978.]